Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1613
Final judgment or decree; prima facie evidence in civil action; exception.

A final judgment or decree rendered in any action brought under section 59-1608 by the state to the effect that a defendant has violated sections 59-1602 to 59-1606 shall be prima facie evidence against such defendant in any action brought by any party against such defendant under section 59-1609 as to all matters as to which such judgment or decree would be an estoppel as between the parties thereto; Provided, that this section shall not apply to consent judgments or decrees when the court makes no finding of illegality.

Laws 1974, LB 1028, § 20.